Missouri, session 2026, HB3398.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 9.390 and 9.391, to read as follows:
9.390. The month of June is hereby designated as "Immigrant Heritage Month"
in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to celebrate the accomplishments and contributions of immigrants
and their children to make Missouri a healthier, safer, more diverse, and more
prosperous place.
9.391. October second each year is hereby designated as "Wrongful Conviction
Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to raise awareness about individuals who have been convicted of
crimes they did not commit and to focus on the causes of and remedies for wrongful
convictions, an issue that affects and devastates individuals, families, and societies
worldwide.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.